Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.650.070

Technology initiatives—Technology levies—Data—Reports.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collect and analyze the following data:

(a) Demographic, distribution, and other data related to technology initiatives; and

(b) Biennial survey data on school and school district progress to accomplish the objectives listed in RCW 28A.650.065(1).

(2) By November 1, 2022, and by November 1st every even year thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, with:

(a) A summary of the technology initiatives data collected under subsection (1) of this section;

(b) The status of the state's progress in accomplishing the following: (i) Accelerate student access to learning devices and related goods and services; (ii) expand training programs and technical assistance on using technology to support student learning; and (iii) build the capacity of schools and districts to support digital navigation services for students and their families;

(c) Recommendations for improving the administration and oversight of the technology initiatives; and

(d) An update on innovative and collaborative activities occurring in communities across the state to support widespread public technology literacy and fluency, as well as student universal access to learning devices.

(3) By November 1, 2022, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall survey districts, collect data, and provide a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature that contains, at a minimum, the following:

(a) A list of districts that have a separate technology levy;

(b) The total amount of funding generated by the technology levies; and

(c) A detailed breakdown on how the funds generated by the technology levies are being used, including, but not limited to, the number of technology devices being purchased with those funds, personnel costs related to servicing and maintaining those devices covered by those funds, and any training or professional development for use of technology provided with those funds.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "technology initiatives" means the technology grants awarded by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.650.065, and the provision of technology consultation, procurement, and training by educational service districts under RCW 28A.650.060.

[ 2021 c 301 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—2021 c 301: See note following RCW 28A.650.060.